Hawaii statutes.
[§323G-4] Limitation
of liability. (a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to give rise
to a private cause of action against a hospital, hospital employee, or a
consultant or contractor that has a contractual relationship with a hospital.

(b) A hospital, hospital employee, or a
consultant or contractor that has a contractual relationship with a hospital
shall not be held liable for the services rendered or not rendered by a
caregiver to a patient at the patient's residence. [L 2016, c 69, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next